Mississippi, session 2026, SB2234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) Study committee established.  There is hereby created the Mississippi Study Committee on Alternative Student Assessment Models for the purpose of examining and developing recommendations regarding alternative methods for measuring student educational outcomes in Mississippi public schools in lieu of the current statewide standardized testing model.  The committee shall, at a minimum: (a)  Evaluate and consider innovative assessment practices including, but not limited to: (i)  Project-based learning assessments; (ii)  Portfolio evaluations; (iii)  Competency-based progress measures; (iv)  Locally developed or teacher-created assessments; and (v)  Other methods that support a more holistic and accurate measurement of student learning, growth and achievement. (b)  Prioritize models that: (i)  Promote instructional equity; (ii)  Reduce unnecessary testing burdens on students and educators; (iii)  Increase flexibility and relevance in classroom instruction; and (iv)  Improve the accuracy and usefulness of student performance data. (2)  Composition of the committee.  (a)  The committee shall be composed of the following nine (9) members: (i)  The State Superintendent of Education, or his/her designee; (ii)  Two (2) individuals not employed by the State Department of Education, appointed by the Governor; (iii)  Two (2) school district superintendents, appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (iv)  Two (2) public school teachers, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; (v)  The Chair of the Senate Education Committee, or his/her designee; and (vi)  The Chair of the House Education Committee, or his/her designee. (b)  The Chairs of the Senate and House Education Committees shall serve as co-chairs of the study committee. (c)  Appointments to the committee shall be made no later than April 10, 2026. (3)  Committee organization and responsibilities.  (a)  The study committee shall hold its first meeting no later than the third week of April, 2026.  At its first meeting, the committee shall establish rules for transacting business and keeping records. (b)  The committee shall convene at least three (3) additional times between its formation and December 1, 2026.  The co-chairs shall call meetings during the months of July, September and October 2026, to ensure sufficient time to deliberate and finalize the committee's recommendations.  The committee may meet more frequently upon the call of the co-chairs.  The committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the Legislature no later than December 1, 2026. (c)  A majority of committee members shall constitute a quorum for conducting business. (4)  Support and cooperation.  (a)  The State Department of Education shall provide necessary staff and administrative support to the committee. (b)  In addition, the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) may provide additional staff and administrative support to the committee upon request and subject to available resources. (c)  To achieve its objectives, the committee may request data, analysis and assistance from any state agency, division or political subdivision. (5)  Compensation of committee members.  (a)  Legislative members of the study committee shall be entitled to per diem and reimbursement of expenses in accordance with Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972. (b)  Non-legislative members shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary travel expenses from any available funds designated for such purposes. (6)  Dissolution of the committee.  The committee shall be dissolved on January 1, 2027, or upon the submission of its final report, whichever is later. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.